Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.130

Power to construe and interpret will.

(1) A personal representative with nonintervention powers has the power to construe and interpret the terms of a probated will, except as the probated will or an order of the court may otherwise direct.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the probated will:

(a) A party, as defined in RCW 11.96A.030, may either petition the court under chapter 11.96A RCW to have an ambiguous provision of a probated will construed by the court or may otherwise address, resolve, and settle the matter under the procedures provided under chapter 11.96A RCW; and

(b) There is a rebuttable presumption that the construction of an ambiguous provision that is made by a personal representative with nonintervention powers is consistent with the intent of the testator.

(3) A party, as defined in RCW 11.96A.030, may commence an action to reform the terms of a will as provided in RCW 11.96A.125.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4007.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.